Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska46-1215
Well repairs, defined.

Well repairs shall mean any change, replacement, or other alteration of any water well, pump, or pumping equipment or any other activity which requires a breaking or opening of the well seal.

Laws 1986, LB 310, § 15.